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DIC2D-03

DTC P0335/12/13 Crankshaft Position Sensor ”A” Circuit

DTC P0339/ 13 Crankshaft Position Sensor ”A” Circuit
Intermittent

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The crankshaft position sensor system consists of a crankshaft position sensor plate and a pick —up coil.
The sensor plate has 34 teeth andisinstalled onthe crankshaft. The pick —-upcoilismade ofaniron core
and magnet. The sensor plate rotates and as each tooth passesthrough the pick —up coil, apulse signalis
created. The pick -up coil generates 34 signals for each engine revolution. Based onthese signals, the en-

gine control ECU calculates the crankshaft position and engine RPM. Using these calculations, the fuel in-
jection time and ignition timing are controlled.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

No crankshaft position sensor signal to engine control ECU
during cranking (2 trip detection logic)

P0335/12/13 " . .
No crankshaft position sensor signal to engine control ECU
with engine speed 600 rpm or more (2 trip detection logic) ) . )
¢ Openors<hort in crarrkshalt position serrsor c~ircu t
Incondition (a), (b) and (c), when no crankshaft position « Crankshaft position sensor
sensor (NE) signalisinputfor 0.05 sec. ormore. : « Signal plate
(1 trip detection logic) » Engine control ECU
P0339/13 f) Engine revolution 1000 rpm or more

(

(9) STA signal is OFF

(h) 3 sec. or more has lapsed after STA signal is switched
from ON to OFF.

_ Reference: Inspection using the oscilloscope.
G2 and NE Signal Waveforms v The correct waveform is as shown.
5
G2 A /Division Tester Connection Specified Condition
Vv E V G2+ (E7 -27) - G2- (E7-32)
Correctwaveformis as shown
NE+ (E7 -25) - NE- (E7-24)
NE
HEENERREEN
20 msec./Division (ldling)
5V
Division
n /
G2 \/
NE
Fro%s  10msec./Division (Idling) 700064
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION

If there is no signal from the crankshaft sensor even though the engine is revolving, the engine control ECU
interprets this as a malfunction of the sensor.
This monitor runs for 10 seconds (the first 10 seconds of engine idle) after the engine is started.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
. Readfreezeframedatausingthehand  -heldtester. Freeze frame datarecordsthe engine conditions
when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped. the engine was warmed up or not, the air —fuelratiolean orrich, etc. atthe

time of the malfunction.

« READVALUEOFHAND -HELDTESTEROROBDIISCANTOOL

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Startthe engine and push the hand -heldtester orthe OBD Il scantool main switch ON.

(c) Select the item "DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / ENGINE SPD”.

e  Theenginespeedcanbe confirmedin DATALIST usingthe hand -heldtester. Ifthereisno NE signals
from the crankshaft position sensor despite the engine revolving, the engine speed will be indicated
as zero. If voltage output of the crankshaft position sensor is insufficient, the engine speed will be indi-
cated as lower RPM (than the actual RPM).

1 Checkresistance of crankshaft position sensor.

PREPARATION:

Disconnect the C4 crankshaft position sensor connector.
CHECK:

Measure the resistance between terminals 1 and 2.

OK:

Component Side

Tester Connection Specified Condition

1-2 1,850102,450 Q (at20 °C (68 °F))

B A21026 NG> Replace crankshaft position sensor.
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2 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
and crankshaft position sensor.

PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the C4 crankshaft position sensor connector.
(b) Disconnect the E9 engine control ECU connector.

Wire Harness Side

CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:
Tester Connection Specified Condition

Crankshaft Position Sensor

A21027 Crankshaft positionsensor (C4 -1) —

NE+ (E9 -25)

Below1 Q

Crankshaft positionsensor (C4 -2) -
—— NE- (E9-24)

Crankshaftpositionsensor (C4 -1)or
NE+ (E9 -25) - Body ground

Below1 Q

10k Q orhigher

Crankshaftpositionsensor (C4 -2) or

10k Q orhigh
NE- (E9-24) - Body ground orhigner

NE+ —
Engine Control ECU .
Co%nector NE- NG Repair or replace harness or connector.
Y A21028

OK

3 | Check sensor installation (crankshaft position sensor).

CHECK:
Check the crankshaft position sensor installation.

NG Tighten sensor.
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4 | Inspect teeth of sensor plate.

PREPARATION:

Remove the crankshaft angle sensor plate (See Pub. No. RM630E, page EM-14).
CHECK:

Check the teeth of sensor plate.

NG> Replace sensor plate.

3

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RMG630E, page FI-74).
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